Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 5. Boot Camp Incarceration Program.

§ 53.1-67.1.
Repealed by Acts 2019, c. 618, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to establishment of community corrections alternative program and supervision upon completion, see §

53.1-67.9

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 117, cl. 2, repealed Acts 1990, c. 474, cl. 2, which provided that this article would expire on December 31, 1995.

Former Article 5 (§

53.1-67.7

), relating to establishment of Boot Camp Incarceration Program; supervision upon completion; report, derived from 1990, c. 474; 1994, c. 926; 1995, c. 117; 1996, cc. 809, 938; 2001, c. 483.